da: Materialehårdhed: Ekstra hård; Ekstra blød; Hård; Høj modstand; Lav modstand; Medium; Blød; Andet
it: Durezza del materiale: Extra duro; Extra morbido; Dura; Alta resistenza; Bassa resistenza; Medio; Morbida; Altro
ru: Твердость материала: Очень твердый; Очень мягкий; Твердый; Высокое сопротивление; Низкое сопротивление; Средний; Мягкий; Другой
es: Dureza del material: Extraduro; Extrasuave; Duro; Alta resistencia; Baja resistencia; Medio; Blando; Otros
hr-HR: Tvrdoća materijala: Ekstra tvrdo; Ekstra meki; Tvrdo; Visoka otpornost; Niska otpornost; Srednje tvrdo; Meki; Ostalo
fi: Materiaalin kovuus: Ekstrakova; Erittäin pehmeä; Kova; Korkea vastus; Alhainen vastus; Keskimääräinen; Pehmeä; Muu
bg-BG: Устойчивост на материала: Изключително твърд; Изключително мек; Твърд; Висока устойчивост; Ниска устойчивост; Среден; Мек; Други
ro-RO: Duritatea materialului: Extra dur; Extra moale; Dur; Rezistență ridicată; Rezistență redusă; Medie; Moale; Altele
zh-CN: 材质硬度: 特硬; 特软; 硬; 高抗性; 低抗性; 媒介; 软; 其他
sl-SI: Trdnost materiala: Zelo trden; Zelo mehak; Trden; Visoka odpornost; Nizka odpornost; Srednje; Mehko; Drugo
th: ความแข็งของวัสดุ: แข็งพิเศษ; อ่อนนุ่มพิเศษ; แข็ง; ความต้านทานสูง; ความต้านทานต่ำ; สื่อ; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
ja: 素材の硬度: 超ハード; 超ソフト; ハード; 高抵抗; 低抵抗; 媒体; ソフト; その他
zh-TW: 材質硬度: 特硬; 特軟; 硬; 高電阻; 低電阻; 媒介; 柔軟; 其他
lt-LT: Medžiagos kietumas: Itin kieta; Itin minkšta; Kieta; Labai atspari; Mažai atspari; Vidutinio kietumo; Minkšta; Kita
pt-BR: Dureza do material: Extra difícil; Extra suave; Duro; Alta resistência; Baixa resistência; Médio; Macio; Outro
sk-SK: Tvrdosť materiálu: Extra tvrdý; Extra jemný; Tvrdý; Vysoká odolnosť; Nízka odolnosť; Stredný; Mäkký; Iné
ko: 재료 경도: 매우 단단함; 매우 부드러움; 하드; 높은 저항; 낮은 저항; 매체; 부드러움; 기타
sv: Materialhårdhet: Extra hård; Extra mjuk; Hård; Högt motstånd; Lågt motstånd; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
de: Materialhärte: Extra hart; Extra weich; Hart; Hoher Widerstand; Geringer Widerstand; Medium; Weich; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Dureza do material: Extraduro; Extramacio; Duro; Alta resistência; Baixa resistência; Médio; Suave; Outro
cs: Tvrdost materiálu: Extra těžký; Extra měkký; Tvrdá; Vysoká odolnost; Nízká odolnost; Médium; Měkká; Jiné
vi: Độ cứng của vật liệu: Cực rắn; Cực mềm; Cứng; Điện trở cao; Điện trở thấp; Vừa; Mềm; Khác
nb: Materialhardhet: Ekstra hard; Ekstra myk; Hard; Høy motstand; Lav motstand; Middels; Myk; Annet
el: Σκληρότητα υλικού: Εξαιρετικά σκληρό; Εξαιρετικά μαλακό; Σκληρή; Υψηλή αντίσταση; Χαμηλή αντίσταση; Μέση; Μαλακό; Άλλο
fr: Dureté du matériau: Très dur; Extra doux; Difficile; Haute résistance; Faible résistance; Moyen; Doux; Autre
hu: Anyag keménysége: Extra kemény; Extra puha; Kemény; Nagy ellenállóképesség; Alacsony ellenállóképesség; Közepes; Puha; Egyéb
pl: Twardość materiału: Bardzo twarda; Bardzo miękki; Twardy; Opornik; Niska rezystancja; Środek; Miękki; Inne
tr: Malzeme Sertliği: Ekstra sert; Ekstra yumuşak; Sert; Yüksek direnç; Düşük direnç; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
en: Material hardness: Extra hard; Extra soft; Hard; High resistance; Low resistance; Medium; Soft; Other
nl: Hardheid materiaal: Extra hard; Extra zacht; Hard; Hoge weerstand; Lage weerstand; Medium; Zacht; Andere